Utah statutes.
31A-30-106.7.   Surcharge for groups changing carriers.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), if prior notice is given, a covered carrier may impose upon a small group that changes coverage to that carrier from another carrier a one-time surcharge of up to 25% of the annualized premium that the carrier could otherwise charge under Section 31A-30-106.

(b)  A covered carrier may not impose the surcharge described in Subsection (1)(a) if:

(i)  the change in carriers occurs on the anniversary of the plan year, as defined in Section 31A-1-301;

(ii)  the previous coverage was terminated under Subsection 31A-30-107(3)(e); or

(iii)  employees from an existing group form a new business.

(2)  A covered carrier may not impose the surcharge described in Subsection (1) if the offer to cover the group occurs at a time other than the anniversary of the plan year because:

(a) (i)  the application for coverage is made prior to the anniversary date in accordance with the covered carrier's published policies; and

(ii)  the offer to cover the group is not issued until after the anniversary date; or

(b) (i)  the application for coverage is made prior to the anniversary date in accordance with the covered carrier's published policies; and

(ii)  additional underwriting or rating information requested by the covered carrier is not received until after the anniversary date.

(3)  If a covered carrier chooses to apply a surcharge under Subsection (1), the application of the surcharge and the criteria for incurring or avoiding the surcharge shall be clearly stated in the:

(a)  written application materials provided to the applicant at the time of application; and

(b)  written producer guidelines.

(4)  The commissioner shall adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to ensure compliance with this section.

